Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 4

Tennessee Authorized Corporation Protection Act

48-103-401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Authorized Corporation Protection Act.”

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 21; T.C.A., § 48-35-401.

Cross-References. Business corporations, dissenting shareholders, title 48, ch. 23.

Tennessee Business Combination Act, title 48, ch. 103, part 2.

Tennessee Control Share Acquisition Act, title 48, ch. 103, part 3.

Tennessee Greenmail Act, title 48, ch. 103, part 5.

Law Reviews.

State Regulation of the Market for Corporate Control: MITE, CTS, and Their Progeny (M. Wayne Marr, Robert W. Mouton), 20 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (1989).

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 42.

48-103-402. Public policy.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares the following to be the public policy of this state:

“Authorized corporations,” as defined in § 48-103-403, have a substantial presence in Tennessee and, through their ongoing business operations in Tennessee, represent and affect a variety of constituencies, including shareholders, employees, customers, suppliers and local communities and their economies, whose welfare is vital to this state's interest;

Takeovers of such authorized corporations can harm the economy of this state by weakening corporate performance and causing unemployment, plant closings, reduced charitable donations, declining population base, reduced income to fee-supported local government services, reduced tax base and reduced income to other businesses;

The state has a substantial and legitimate interest in providing to these authorized corporations the benefits of the Tennessee Business Combination Act, compiled in part 2 of this chapter, and the Tennessee Control Share Acquisition Act, compiled in part 3 of this chapter, which promote and encourage long-term growth and stability of such authorized corporations.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 22; T.C.A., § 48-35-402.

48-103-403. “Authorized corporation” defined.

“Authorized corporation” means a foreign corporation which is required to obtain a certificate of authority from the Tennessee secretary of state and which meets two (2) or more of the following tests:

The corporation has its principal place of business located in this state;

The corporation has the principal office or offices or place or places of business of significant subsidiaries, representing in the aggregate not less than twenty (20%) of such corporation's consolidated net sales, located in this state;

A majority of such corporation's fixed assets, including those of any subsidiary, located in the United States, as valued by reference to the balance sheet at the end of its most recent fiscal year, are located in this state;

More than ten percent (10%) of the beneficial owners of the voting stock or more than ten percent (10%) of such corporation's shares of voting stock are beneficially owned by residents of this state;

The corporation, including any significant subsidiary, employs more than two hundred fifty (250) individuals in this state or has a combined annual payroll paid to residents of this state which is in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000);

The corporation, including any significant subsidiary, produces goods and/or services in this state which result in annual gross receipts in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000);

The corporation, including any significant subsidiary, has physical assets and/or deposits, including those of any subsidiary, located within this state which exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in value.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 23; T.C.A., § 48-35-403.

48-103-404. Applicability of certain provisions concerning business combinations and control share acquisitions.

Sections 48-103-203 — 48-103-209 shall apply to an authorized corporation to the same extent as such provisions apply to a “resident domestic corporation,” as defined therein; provided, that the board of directors or shareholders of such foreign corporation have adopted a bylaw or charter provision specifying that the authorized corporation shall be subject to this subsection (a).

Sections 48-103-304 and 48-103-311 shall apply to an authorized corporation to the same extent as such provisions apply to a “corporation,” as defined therein; provided, that the board of directors or shareholders of such authorized corporation have adopted a bylaw or charter provision specifying that such authorized corporation shall be subject to this subsection (b).

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 24; T.C.A., § 48-35-404.

48-103-405. Construction with laws of other jurisdictions.

If any jurisdiction under the laws of which an authorized corporation is organized adopts any laws containing provisions that are expressly inconsistent with this part as applicable to such authorized corporation, this part shall be inapplicable to such authorized corporation to the extent necessary to resolve such inconsistency.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 25; T.C.A., § 48-35-405.

48-103-406. Severability.

If any provision or clause of this part or application thereof to any corporation, person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this part which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end this part is declared to be severable.

Acts 1988, ch. 500, § 26; T.C.A., § 48-35-406.